New Jersey, session 221, A3191.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall establish within the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs a fund for the purpose of reimbursing a municipality for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the municipal police force or department for the management and control of crowds and traffic, and for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by a municipality for litter and garbage collection, and the provision of portable restrooms, related to crowds, at a New Jersey Motor Vehicles Commission location during the COVID-19 emergency period. b.    The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated thereto by section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and such other moneys as may be appropriated or otherwise made available for that purpose. c.     Not more than five percent of the moneys paid into the fund during any fiscal year of the State may be used to pay the costs of the fund's administration by the Division of Local Government Services during that fiscal year. d.    A municipality may submit an application to the Division of Local Government Services for reimbursement of municipal police and sanitation expenses, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, in accordance with procedures specified by the division. e.     COVID-19 means the coronavirus disease 2019, as announced by the World Health Organization on February 11, 2020, and first identified in Wuhan, China. COVID-19 emergency period means the period beginning March 9, 2020 and continuing for as long as a public health emergency, pursuant to the Emergency Health Powers Act, P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-1 et seq.), or a state of emergency, pursuant to P.L.1942, c. 251 (C.App.A.9-33 et seq.), or both, that has been declared by the Governor in response to COVID-19, is in effect. 2.    There is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund to the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs $500,000 for the reimbursement of reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by a municipality for the management and control of crowds and traffic, and for litter and garbage collection, and the provision of portable restrooms, related to crowds, at a New Jersey Motor Vehicles Commission location during the COVID-19 emergency period. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately, shall be retroactive to March 9, 2020, and shall expire upon the conclusion of the COVID-19 emergency period.